Utah, session 2026, SB171.
Section 1. Section 53-3-404 is amended to read:53-3-404. Requirements to drive commercial motor vehicle.(1)A person An individual may not drive a commercial motor vehicle, unless the person individual has been issued and is in immediate possession of:(a)a CDL license certificate valid for the commercial motor vehicle the person individual is driving; or(b)a valid CDIP license certificate in accordance with Section 53-3-408.(2)(a)A licensee shall display a CDL or CDIP license certificate upon demand of a justice court judge, a peace officer, a special function officer, a port-of-entry officer, or a designee of the division.(b)It is a defense to a charge under this section that the person individual charged produces in court a CDL or CDIP license certificate that is issued to the person individual and is valid at the time of the citation or arrest.(3)A person An individual may not drive a commercial motor vehicle if the person's individual's privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle is:(a)suspended, revoked, or canceled;(b)subject to a disqualification;(c)subject to an out-of-service order; or(d)not medically certified as defined in Section 53-3-402.(4)A person An individual may not drive a commercial motor vehicle if the commercial motor vehicle is subject to an out-of-service order.(5)Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the division shall issue a commercial driver license bearing a "K" intrastate-only restriction described in Subsection 53-3-412 (1)(c)(ii) to an applicant who:(a)is lawfully present in the United States;(b)is authorized to work under federal law;(c)acknowledges, by a signed statement on a form provided by the division, that:(i)the license is valid only for intrastate commerce within Utah; and(ii)operation of a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce or outside Utah while holding the license is prohibited and may result in sanction, disqualification, or revocation; and(d)meets all knowledge, skills, and medical qualification standards applicable to commercial driver licensing under this chapter.(6)(a)An individual applying for a license under Subsection (5) is not required to be domiciled in the state for purposes of 49 C.F.R. Part 383.(b)An individual currently domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction who applies for a license described in Subsection (5) shall meet the requirements concerning applicants domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction described in 49 C.F.R. Part 383.(7)A license issued under Subsection (5):(a)shall clearly display the "K" intrastate-only restriction;(b)shall expire on the day that the individual's federal work authorization expires;(c)is not valid for operation of a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce or outside Utah; and(d)does not constitute a commercial driver license under 49 C.F.R. Part 383 for interstate purposes.(8)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to issue intrastate-only commercial driver licenses bearing a "K" intrastate-only restriction to lawfully present, non-domiciled individuals, including procedures for verifying work authorization.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-3-412 is amended to read:53-3-412. CDL classifications, endorsements, and restrictions.(1)A CDL may be granted with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions:(a)Classifications:(i)Class A: any combination of vehicles with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or more, if the GVWR of the one or more vehicles being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds;(ii)Class B: any single motor vehicle with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or more, including that motor vehicle when towing a vehicle with a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less; and(iii)Class C: any single motor vehicle with a GVWR of less than 26,001 pounds or that motor vehicle when towing a vehicle with a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less when the vehicle is designed:(A)to carry 16 or more passengers, including the driver;(B)as a school bus, and weighing less than 26,001 pounds GVWR; or(C)to transport hazardous materials that requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F.(b)Endorsements:(i)"H" authorizes the driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials as defined in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.5.(ii)"N" authorizes the driver to drive a tank vehicle.(iii)"P" authorizes the driver to drive a motor vehicle designed to carry 16 or more passengers including the driver.(iv)"S" authorizes the driver to transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home to school, school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.(v)"T" authorizes the driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle with a double or triple trailer.(vi)"X" authorizes the driver to drive a tank vehicle and transport hazardous materials.(c)Restrictions:(i)"E" restricts the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle with a manual transmission.(ii)(A)"K" restricts the driver to driving intrastate only any commercial motor vehicle as defined by 49 C.F.R. Parts 383 and 390.(B)The division may issue a CDL bearing a "K" restriction as described in Section 53-3-404 to an otherwise qualified applicant who is lawfully present in the United States but who is not domiciled in Utah for purposes of 49 C.F.R. Part 383.(iii)"L" restricts the driver to driving a commercial motor vehicle not equipped with air brakes.(iv)"J" provides for other CDL restrictions.(v)"M" restricts a driver from transporting passengers using a class A bus.(vi)"N" restricts a driver from transporting passengers using a class A or class B bus.(vii)"O" restricts a driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle equipped with a tractor trailer.(viii)(A)"V" indicates that the driver has been issued a variance by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration in reference to the driver's medical certification status.(B)A driver with a "V" restriction shall have the letter outlining the specifications for the variance in the driver's possession along with the driver's commercial driver license when operating a commercial motor vehicle.(ix)"Z" restricts a driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle with non-fully equipped air brakes.(2)A commercial driver instruction permit may be granted with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions:(a)Classifications:(i)Class A: any combination of vehicles with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or more, if the GVWR of the one or more vehicles being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds;(ii)Class B: any single motor vehicle with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or more, including that motor vehicle when towing a vehicle with a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less; and(iii)Class C: any single motor vehicle with a GVWR of less than 26,001 pounds or that motor vehicle when towing a vehicle with a GVWR of 10,000 pounds or less when the vehicle is designed:(A)to carry 16 or more passengers, including the driver;(B)as a school bus, and weighing less than 26,001 pounds GVWR; or(C)to transport hazardous material that requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 C.F.R. Part 172, Subpart F.(b)Endorsements:(i)"N" authorizes the driver to drive a tank vehicle.  An "N" endorsement may only be issued with an "X" restriction.(ii)"P" authorizes the driver to drive a motor vehicle designed to carry 16 or more passengers including the driver.  A "P" endorsement may only be issued with a "P" restriction.(iii)"S" authorizes the driver to transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home to school, school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.  An "S" endorsement may only be issued with a "P" restriction.(c)Restrictions:(i)"K" restricts the driver to driving intrastate only any commercial motor vehicle as defined by 49 C.F.R. Parts 383 and 390.(ii)"L" restricts the driver to driving a commercial motor vehicle not equipped with air brakes.(iii)"M" restricts a driver from transporting passengers using a class A bus.(iv)"N" restricts a driver from transporting passengers using a class A or class B bus.(v)"P" restricts a driver from having one or more passengers in the vehicle while driving a commercial motor vehicle bus unless the passenger is:(A)a federal or state auditor or inspector;(B)a test examiner;(C)another trainee; or(D)the CDL holder accompanying the CDIP holder as required in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.25.(vi)(A)"V" indicates that the driver has been issued a variance by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration in reference to the driver's medical certification status.(B)A driver with a "V" restriction shall have the letter outlining the specifications for the variance in the driver's possession along with the driver's commercial driver license when operating a commercial motor vehicle.(vii)"X" restricts a driver from having cargo in a commercial motor vehicle tank vehicle.(3)A violation of this section is an infraction.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.